test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-4lex_juarbudeves_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - juárbudeves: # MLO; To my mind not a full paragigm; a rare word
    juárbudeves+A+Sg+Nom: juárbudeves
    juárbudeves+A+Sg+Gen: juárbudiäkká
    juárbudeves+A+Sg+Acc: juárbudiäkká
    juárbudeves+A+Sg+Ill: juárbudiäkkás
    juárbudeves+A+Sg+Loc: juárbudiäkkást
    juárbudeves+A+Sg+Com: juárbudiäkkáin
    juárbudeves+A+Ess: juárbudevesin
    juárbudeves+A+Pl+Nom: juárbudiäkkáh
    juárbudeves+A+Pl+Gen: juárbudiäkkái
    juárbudeves+A+Pl+Acc: juárbudiäkkáid
    juárbudeves+A+Pl+Ill: juárbudiäkkáid
    juárbudeves+A+Pl+Loc: juárbudiäkkáin
    juárbudeves+A+Pl+Com: [juárbudiäkkáiguin, juárbudiäkkáigijn]
    juárbudeves+A+Pl+Abe: juárbudiäkkáittáá
